Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2797.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 299A.41, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Killed in the line of duty. (a) "Killed in the line of duty" does not include deaths from natural causes, except as provided in this subdivision. In the case of a public safety officer, killed in the line of duty includes the death of a public safety officer caused by accidental means while the public safety officer is acting in the course and scope of duties as a public safety officer. Killed in the line of duty also means if a public safety officer dies as the direct and proximate result of a heart attack, stroke, or vascular rupture, that officer shall be presumed to have died as the direct and proximate result of a personal injury sustained in the line of duty if: (1) that officer, while on duty: (i) engaged in a deleted text begin situation, and that engagement involved nonroutine stressful or strenuous physicaldeleted text end law enforcement, fire suppression, rescue, hazardous material response, emergency medical services, prison security, disaster relief, or other emergency response activity; or (ii) participated in a training exercisedeleted text begin , and that participation involved nonroutine stressful or strenuous physical activitydeleted text end ; (2) that officer died as a result of a heart attack, stroke, or vascular rupture suffered: (i) while engaging or participating under clause (1); (ii) while still on duty after engaging or participating under clause (1); or (iii) not later than 24 hours after engaging or participating under clause (1); and (3) the presumption is not overcome by competent medical evidence to the contrary. (b) "Killed in the line of duty" also means that the officer died due to suicide: (1) secondary to a diagnosis of posttraumatic stress disorder as described in the most recent edition of the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders published by the American Psychiatric Association; or (2) within 45 days of the end of exposure, while on duty, to a traumatic event. new text begin (c) "Killed in the line of duty" also means that the officer died as a result of complications caused by exposure sustained in the line of duty to any of the following infectious diseases, viruses, or bacteria, if medical records identify the disease, virus, or bacteria as a cause of or contributing factor to the death: COVID-19; influenza; hepatitis B; hepatitis C; tuberculosis; HIV/AIDS; meningitis; MRSA; whooping cough; or streptococcus pneumoniae. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE; RETROACTIVE APPLICATION. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment and applies retroactively from February 1, 2020. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 299A.41, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Public safety officer. "Public safety officer" includes: (1) a peace officer defined in section 626.84, subdivision 1, paragraph (c) or (d); (2) a correction officer employed at a correctional facility and charged with maintaining the safety, security, discipline, and custody of inmates at the facility; (3) a corrections staff person working in a public agency and supervising offenders in the community as defined in sections 243.05, subdivision 6; 244.19, subdivision 1; and 401.01, subdivision 2; (4) an individual employed on a full-time new text begin or part-time new text end basis by the state or by a fire department of a governmental subdivision of the state, who is engaged in any of the following duties: (i) firefighting; (ii) emergency motor vehicle operation; (iii) investigation into the cause and origin of fires; (iv) the provision of emergency medical services; or (v) hazardous material responder; (5) a legally enrolled member of a volunteer fire department or member of an independent nonprofit firefighting corporation who is engaged in the hazards of firefighting; (6) a good samaritan while complying with the request or direction of a public safety officer to assist the officer; (7) a reserve police officer or a reserve deputy sheriff while acting under the supervision and authority of a political subdivision; (8) a driver or attendant with a licensed basic or advanced life-support transportation service who is engaged in providing emergency care; (9) a first responder who is certified by the director of the Office of Emergency Medical Services to perform basic emergency skills before the arrival of a licensed ambulance service and who is a member of an organized service recognized by a local political subdivision to respond to medical emergencies to provide initial medical care before the arrival of an ambulance; and (10) a person, other than a state trooper, employed by the commissioner of public safety and assigned to the State Patrol, whose primary employment duty is either Capitol security or the enforcement of commercial motor vehicle laws and regulations. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE; RETROACTIVE APPLICATION. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment and applies retroactively from February 1, 2020. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin PROCESS FOR RETROACTIVE CLAIMS.new text end new text begin (a) Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 299A.47, claims for benefits arising out of deaths occurring before July 1, 2025, where eligibility is due to the retroactive changes made in this act are timely if filed by July 1, 2027. Claims for benefits arising out of deaths that occur on or after July 1, 2027, are subject to the limitation period described in Minnesota Statutes, section 299A.47. new text end new text begin (b) Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 299A.47, the commissioner of public safety shall review previously denied benefit claims for deaths occurring between February 1, 2020, and the effective date of this act, determine whether the applicant is eligible for benefits based on the retroactive application of the amendments made in this act, and award applicable benefits as necessary. new text end